Washington statutes.
RCW 18.46.090

Information confidential.

All information received by the department through filed reports, inspection, or as otherwise authorized under this chapter shall not be disclosed publicly in any manner as to identify individuals or birthing centers except in a proceeding involving the question of licensure.

[ 2000 c 93 s 36; 1951 c 168 s 10.]